Ohio, session 136, HB475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 125.18 and 5922.08 be amended and 9
sections 5502.282, 5502.283, and 5922.09 of the Revised Code be 10
enacted to read as follows: 11
Sec. 125.18. (A) There is hereby established the office of 12
information technology within the department of administrative 13
services. The office shall be under the supervision of a state 14
chief information officer to be appointed by the director of 15
administrative services and subject to removal at the pleasure 16
of the director. The chief information officer is an assistant 17
director of administrative services. 18
(B) Under the direction of the director of administrative 19

H. B. No. 475 Page 2
As Introduced
services, the state chief information officer shall lead, 20
oversee, and direct state agency activities related to 21
information technology development and use. In that regard, the 22
state chief information officer shall do all of the following: 23
(1) Coordinate and superintend statewide efforts to 24
promote common use and development of technology by state 25
agencies. The office of information technology shall establish 26
policies and standards that govern and direct state agency 27
participation in statewide programs and initiatives. 28
(2) Coordinate with the office of procurement services to 29
establish policies and standards for state agency acquisition of 30
information technology supplies and services; 31
(3) Establish policies and standards for the use of common 32
information technology by state agencies, including, but not 33
limited to, hardware, software, technology services, and 34
security, and the extension of the service life of information 35
technology systems, with which state agencies shall comply; 36
(4) Establish criteria and review processes to identify 37
state agency information technology projects or purchases that 38
require alignment or oversight. As appropriate, the department 39
of administrative services shall provide the governor and the 40
director of budget and management with notice and advice 41
regarding the appropriate allocation of resources for those 42
projects. The state chief information officer may require state 43
agencies to provide, and may prescribe the form and manner by 44
which they must provide, information to fulfill the state chief 45
information officer's alignment and oversight role; 46
(5) Establish policies and procedures for the security of 47
personal information that is maintained and destroyed by state 48

H. B. No. 475 Page 3
As Introduced
agencies; 49
(6) Employ a chief information security officer who is 50
responsible for the implementation of the policies and 51
procedures described in division (B)(5) of this section and for 52
coordinating the implementation of those policies and procedures 53
in all of the state agencies; 54
(7) Employ a chief privacy officer who is responsible for 55
advising state agencies when establishing policies and 56
procedures for the security of personal information and 57
developing education and training programs regarding the state's 58
security procedures; 59
(8) Establish policies on the purchasing, use, and 60
reimbursement for use of handheld computing and 61
telecommunications devices by state agency employees; 62
(9) Establish policies for the reduction of printing and 63
for the increased use of electronic records by state agencies; 64
(10) Establish policies for the reduction of energy 65
consumption by state agencies; 66
(11) Compute the amount of revenue attributable to the 67
amortization of all equipment purchases and capitalized systems 68
from information technology service delivery and major 69
information technology purchases, MARCS administration, and 70
enterprise applications operating appropriation items and major 71
computer purchases capital appropriation items that is recovered 72
as part of the information technology services rates the 73
department of administrative services charges and deposits into 74
the information technology fund created in section 125.15 of the 75
Revised Code, and the user fees the department of administrative 76
services charges and deposits in the MARCS administration fund 77

H. B. No. 475 Page 4
As Introduced
created in section 4501.29 of the Revised Code, the rates the 78
department of administrative services charges to benefiting 79
agencies for the operation and management of information 80
technology applications and deposits in the enterprise 81
applications fund. The enterprise applications fund is hereby 82
created in the state treasury. 83
(12) Regularly review and make recommendations regarding 84
improving the infrastructure of the state's cybersecurity 85
operations with existing resources and through partnerships 86
between government, business, and institutions of higher 87
education; 88
(13) Assist, as needed, with general state efforts to grow 89
the cybersecurity industry in this state. 90
(C)(1) The chief information security officer shall assist 91
each state agency with the development of an information 92
technology security strategic plan and review that plan, and 93
each state agency shall submit that plan to the state chief 94
information officer. The chief information security officer may 95
require that each state agency update its information technology 96
security strategic plan annually as determined by the state 97
chief information officer. 98
(2) The chief information security officer shall assist 99
the state cybersecurity strategic advisor with the assessment 100
and report required under section 5502.282 of the Revised Code. 101
(3) Prior to the implementation of any information 102
technology data system, a state agency shall prepare or have 103
prepared a privacy impact statement for that system. 104
(D) When a state agency requests a purchase of information 105
technology supplies or services under Chapter 125. of the 106

H. B. No. 475 Page 5
As Introduced
Revised Code, the state chief information officer may review and 107
reject the requested purchase for noncompliance with information 108
technology direction, plans, policies, standards, or project- 109
alignment criteria. 110
(E) The office of information technology may operate 111
technology services for state agencies in accordance with this 112
chapter. 113
Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the 114
contrary, the office of information technology may assess a 115
transaction fee on each license or registration issued as part 116
of an electronic licensing system operated by the office in an 117
amount determined by the office not to exceed three dollars and 118
fifty cents. The transaction fee shall apply to all 119
transactions, regardless of form, that immediately precede the 120
issuance, renewal, reinstatement, reactivation of, or other 121
activity that results in, a license or registration to operate 122
as a regulated professional or entity. Each license or 123
registration is a separate transaction to which a fee under this 124
division applies. Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised 125
Code to the contrary, if a fee is assessed under this section, 126
no agency, board, or commission shall issue a license or 127
registration unless a fee required by this division has been 128
received. The director of administrative services may collect 129
the fee or require a state agency, board, or commission for 130
which the system is being operated to collect the fee. Amounts 131
received under this division shall be deposited in or 132
transferred to the occupational licensing and regulatory fund 133
created in section 4743.05 or the Revised Code. 134
(F) With the approval of the director of administrative 135
services, the office of information technology may establish 136

H. B. No. 475 Page 6
As Introduced
cooperative agreements with federal and local government 137
agencies and state agencies that are not under the authority of 138
the governor for the provision of technology services and the 139
development of technology projects. 140
(G) The office of information technology may operate a 141
program to make information technology purchases. The director 142
of administrative services may recover the cost of operating the 143
program from all participating government entities by issuing 144
intrastate transfer voucher billings for the procured technology 145
or through any pass-through billing method agreed to by the 146
director of administrative services, the director of budget and 147
management, and the participating government entities that will 148
receive the procured technology. 149
If the director of administrative services chooses to 150
recover the program costs through intrastate transfer voucher 151
billings, the participating government entities shall process 152
the intrastate transfer vouchers to pay for the cost. Amounts 153
received under this section for the information technology 154
purchase program shall be deposited to the credit of the 155
information technology governance fund created in section 125.15 156
of the Revised Code. 157
(H) Upon request from the director of administrative 158
services, the director of budget and management may transfer 159
cash from the information technology fund created in section 160
125.15 of the Revised Code, the MARCS administration fund 161
created in section 4501.29 of the Revised Code, or the 162
enterprise applications fund created in division (B)(11) of this 163
section to the major information technology purchases fund in an 164
amount not to exceed the amount computed under division (B)(11) 165
of this section. The major information technology purchases fund 166

H. B. No. 475 Page 7
As Introduced
is hereby created in the state treasury. 167
(I) As used in this section: 168
(1) "Personal information" has the same meaning as in 169
section 149.45 of the Revised Code. 170
(2) "State agency" means every organized body, office, or 171
agency established by the laws of the state for the exercise of 172
any function of state government, other than any state-supported 173
institution of higher education, the office of the auditor of 174
state, treasurer of state, secretary of state, or attorney 175
general, the adjutant general's department, the bureau of 176
workers' compensation, the industrial commission, the public 177
employees retirement system, the Ohio police and fire pension 178
fund, the state teachers retirement system, the school employees 179
retirement system, the state highway patrol retirement system, 180
the general assembly or any legislative agency, the capitol 181
square review advisory board, or the courts or any judicial 182
agency. 183
Sec. 5502.282. (A) The state cybersecurity strategic 184
advisor, appointed under Executive Order 2022-07D, issued on 185
April 25, 2022, with the assistance of the executive director of 186
the emergency management agency, and the chief information 187
security officer, shall annually assess the cybersecurity 188
infrastructure of municipal corporations in the state and shall 189
prepare and submit a report of the assessment to the governor, 190
the adjutant general, and to the general assembly in accordance 191
with division (B) of section 101.68 of the Revised Code. 192
(B) The state cybersecurity strategic advisor may certify 193
Ohio-based private cybersecurity firms and may contract with 194
certified firms to do the following: 195

H. B. No. 475 Page 8
As Introduced
(1) Assist the state cybersecurity strategic advisor in 196
the assessment of municipal corporation cybersecurity 197
infrastructure under the supervision of the advisor and in 198
accordance with established assessment standards; 199
(2) Respond, in coordination with the Ohio cyber reserve 200
under section 5922.08 of the Revised Code, to a cybersecurity 201
incident. 202
(C) Under the contract or certification, the private 203
cybersecurity firm shall do all of the following: 204
(1) Register in Ohio and be in good standing with the 205
secretary of state; 206
(2) Provide proof of insurance coverage including 207
cybersecurity liability coverage; 208
(3) Employ staff with relevant certifications. At least 209
one staff member of the private cybersecurity firm shall possess 210
certification from at least one of the following: the certified 211
information systems security professional (CISSP), certified 212
information security manager (CISM), certified information 213
systems auditor (CISA), global information assurance 214
certification (GIAC), offensive security certified professional 215
(OSCP), service organization control (SOC) 2, or an equivalent. 216
(4) Demonstrate proficiency in cybersecurity frameworks 217
such as any of the following: the national institute of 218
standards and technology cybersecurity framework (NIST CSF), 219
national institute of standards and technology (NIST) 800-53, 220
center for internet security (CIS) controls, or international 221
organization for standardization (ISO) 27001; 222
(5) Provide a documented history of providing 223
cybersecurity risk assessments, incident response, or municipal 224

H. B. No. 475 Page 9
As Introduced
information technology support and have the ability to respond 225
within forty-eight hours to a municipal corporation incident or 226
request; 227
(6) Subject key personnel to background checks or 228
attestations of trustworthiness; 229
(7) Complete a state-offered orientation or partnership 230
workshop to ensure alignment with government protocols and 231
expectations; 232
(8) Adhere to a standardized code of ethics, including 233
transparency; 234
(9) Agree to provisions prohibiting the retention of data; 235
(10) Agree to provisions prohibiting the disclosure of 236
client data; 237
(11) Agree to provisions specifying the requirements of 238
reports that shall be provided to the state cybersecurity 239
strategic advisor by the private cybersecurity firm. 240
Sec. 5502.283. A countywide emergency management agency 241
under section 5502.26 of the Revised Code, a regional authority 242
for emergency management under section 5502.27 of the Revised 243
Code, or a program for emergency management within a political 244
subdivision under section 5502.271 of the Revised Code, shall 245
incorporate utilization of the secure toll-free cyber attack 246
telephone line, established under section 5922.09 of the Revised 247
Code, into the entity's emergency plan. 248
Sec. 5922.08. (A) The governor, as commander-in-chief of 249
the Ohio organized militia, may order individuals or units of 250
the Ohio cyber reserve to state active duty to protect state, 251
county, and local government entities and critical 252

H. B. No. 475 Page 10
As Introduced
infrastructure, including election systems, or for training as 253
the governor determines necessary. The governor, upon the 254
request of a business or citizen, also may order individuals or 255
units of the Ohio cyber reserve to state active duty to protect 256
that business or citizen. 257
(B) The governor, as commander-in-chief of the Ohio 258
organized militia, upon the request of a state, county, or local 259
government entity, shall order individuals or units of the Ohio 260
cyber reserve to state active service to support the state, 261
county, or local government entity that has been a victim of a 262
cyber attack. When so ordered, the Ohio cyber reserve shall 263
respond within forty-eight hours. 264
(C) When responding to a cyberattack under division (B) of 265
this section, the Ohio cyber reserve may coordinate with or 266
deploy a private cybersecurity firm that has been certified by, 267
and is under contract with, the state cybersecurity strategic 268
advisor under section 5502.282 of the Revised Code to provide 269
specialized support. 270
(D) When ordered by the governor to perform duty or 271
training under this section or section 5923.21 of the Revised 272
Code, members of the Ohio cyber reserve shall have the same 273
protections afforded by the "Servicemembers Civil Relief Act," 274
Pub. L. No. 108-189, 50 U.S.C. 3901-4043, and by the "Uniformed 275
Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act," 108 Stat. 276
3149, 38 U.S.C. 4301-4333. 277
Sec. 5922.09. The adjutant general shall establish a toll - 278
free telephone number that may be used by a state, county, or 279
local government entity to report a cyberattack and to request 280
immediate support by the Ohio cyber reserve. The telephone 281
number shall be staffed by live personnel twenty-four hours per 282

H. B. No. 475 Page 11
As Introduced
day at its answering point. The telephone line shall be 283
protected by security measures to prevent eavesdropping or 284
interception. 285
The adjutant general shall establish adequate rules and 286
procedures to facilitate an immediate response to a request for 287
support by a state, county, or local government entity, 288
including the procedure for contacting the governor's office to 289
consider an order under division (B) of section 5922.08 of the 290
Revised Code. 291
Section 2. That existing sections 125.18 and 5922.08 of 292
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 293